Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1107
Secretary of commission; employ.

The State Highway Commission, subject to the approval of the Governor, shall employ a person who shall act as secretary of the commission.

Laws 1953, c. 334, § 7, p. 1097;

Laws 1955, c. 163, § 2, p. 469.